Utah statutes.
10-5-128.   Deposit of town funds -- Commingling with personal funds
prohibited -- Suspension from office for unauthorized use or profit from town
funds.
The treasurer shall promptly deposit all town funds in the appropriate bank
accounts of the town. It shall be unlawful for any person to commingle town
funds with his or her own money. Whenever it shall appear that the treasurer
or any officer is making profit out of public money, or is using the same for
any purpose not authorized by law, such treasurer or officer shall be
suspended from office.
